Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.380

Owner.

"Owner" means a person who has a lawful right of possession of a vehicle by reason of obtaining it by purchase, exchange, gift, lease, inheritance or legal action whether or not the vehicle is subject to a security interest and means registered owner where the reference to owner may be construed as either to registered or legal owner.

[ 1975 c 25 s 2; 1961 c 12 s 46.04.380. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 39; prior: 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part; 1929 c 180 s 1, part; 1927 c 309 s 2, part; RRS s 6362-2, part.]